Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20168-1118
Violations; damages; statute of limitations.

(1) Any person who offers or sells a security in violation of section
8-1104 or offers or sells a security by means of any untrue statement of a
material fact or any omission to state a material fact necessary in order
to make the statements made in the light of the circumstances under which
they are made not misleading, the buyer not knowing of the untruth or omission,
and who does not sustain the burden of proof that he or she did not know and
in the exercise of reasonable care could not have known of the untruth or
omission, shall be liable to the person buying the security from him or her,
who may sue either at law or in equity to recover the consideration paid for
the security, together with interest at six percent per annum from the date
of payment, costs, and reasonable attorney's fees, less the amount of any
income received on the security, upon the tender of the security, or for damages
if he or she no longer owns the security,
except that in actions brought based on a transaction exempt from registration
under subdivision (23) of section 8-1111, no person shall be liable for any
statement of a material fact made or for an omission of a material fact required
to be stated or necessary to make the statement made not misleading unless
such statement or omission was made with the intent to defraud or mislead,
with the burden of proof in such cases being on the claimant.
Damages shall be the amount that would be recoverable upon a tender less (a)
the value of the security when the buyer disposed of it and (b) interest at
six percent per annum from the date of disposition.

(2) Any investment adviser who provides investment adviser services
to another person which results in a willful violation of subsection (2),
(3), or (4) of section 8-1102, subsection (2) of section 8-1103, or section
8-1114 or any investment adviser who employs any device, scheme, or artifice
to defraud such person or engages in any act, practice, or course of business
which operates or would operate as a fraud or deceit on such person shall
be liable to such person. Such person may sue either at law or in equity to
recover the consideration paid for the investment adviser services and any
loss due to such investment adviser services, together with interest at six
percent per annum from the date of payment of the consideration plus costs
and reasonable attorney's fees, less the amount of any income received from
such investment adviser services and any other economic benefit.

(3) Every person who directly or indirectly controls a person liable
under subsections (1) and (2) of this section, including every partner, limited
liability company member, officer, director, or person occupying a similar
status or performing similar functions of a partner, limited liability company
member, officer, or director, or employee of such person who materially aids
in the conduct giving rise to liability, and every broker-dealer, issuer-dealer,
agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative who materially
aids in such conduct shall be liable jointly and severally with and to the
same extent as such person, unless able to sustain the burden of proof that
he or she did not know, and in the exercise of reasonable care could not have
known, of the existence of the facts by reason of which the liability is alleged
to exist. There shall be contribution as in cases of contract among the several
persons so liable.

(4) Any tender specified in this section may be made at any time before
entry of judgment. Every cause of action under the Securities Act of Nebraska
shall survive the death of any person who might have been a plaintiff or defendant.
No person may sue under this section more than three years after the contract
of sale or the rendering of investment advice. No person may sue under this
section (a) if the buyer received a written offer, before suit and at a time
when he or she owned the security, to refund the consideration paid together
with interest at six percent per annum from the date of payment, less the
amount of any income received on the security, and the buyer failed to accept
the offer within thirty days of its receipt, or (b) if the buyer received
such an offer before suit and at a time when he or she did not own the security,
unless the buyer rejected the offer in writing within thirty days of its receipt.

(5) No person who has made or engaged in the performance of any contract
in violation of any provision of the act or any rule or order under the act,
or who has acquired any purported right under any such contract with knowledge
of the facts by reason of which its making or performance was in violation,
may base any suit on the contract. Any condition, stipulation, or provision
binding any person acquiring any security or receiving any investment advice
to waive compliance with any provision of the act or any rule or order under
the act shall be void.

Laws 1965, c. 549, § 18, p. 1793;

Laws 1973, LB 167, § 8;

Laws 1993, LB 216, § 9;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 99;

Laws 1994, LB 884, § 14;

Laws 2013, LB205, § 3.

Expert testimony is not required to prove that a party offered or sold an unregistered security which was required by law to be registered or sold a security by means of an untrue statement or omission of a material fact. Hooper v. Freedom Fin. Group, 280 Neb. 111, 784 N.W.2d 437 (2010).

Officers and directors of a corporation which violated the law are strictly liable for a violation of the Securities Act of Nebraska unless the statutory defense of lack of knowledge is proved. Hooper v. Freedom Fin. Group, 280 Neb. 111, 784 N.W.2d 437 (2010).

Liability under the Securities Act of Nebraska extends only to a person who successfully solicits purchase of securities, motivated at least in part by desire to serve his or her own financial interests or those of the securities owner. Wilson v. Misko, 244 Neb. 526, 508 N.W.2d 238 (1993).

Person who offers or sells security in violation of section 8-1104 shall be liable to buyer of security, who may recover consideration paid, together with interest, costs, and attorneys' fees. Labenz v. Labenz, 198 Neb. 548, 253 N.W.2d 855 (1977).